Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1086.
do enact as follows:AB1086,11Section 1. 49.45 (30y) of the statutes is created to read:AB1086,2,4249.45 (30y) Maternal mental health screenings. (a) A maternal mental 3health screening under s. 49.46 (2) (b) 12e. that adheres to the standards in par. (b) 4provided to an individual is reimbursable under the Medical Assistance program.AB1086,2,85(b) 1. The department, in consultation with organizations that work to 6improve maternal mental health and that are led by Black persons, Indigenous 7persons, or other persons of color, shall develop standards and best practices for 8maternal mental health screenings.AB1086,2,1392. Maternal mental health screenings may be provided by a licensed midwife, 10as defined in s. 440.9805 (2), a person licensed to engage in the practice of nurse-11midwifery under s. 441.15, or any other licensed health care provider who may 12provide the maternal mental health screening consistent with the provider’s scope 13of practice.AB1086,2,1914(c) If the department determines that it is unable to implement this 15subsection without a state plan amendment or waiver of federal law, the 16department shall submit to the federal department of health and human services 17any state plan amendment or waiver of federal law necessary to implement this 18subsection. If the federal government disapproves the amendment or waiver 19request, the department is not required to implement this subsection.AB1086,21Section 2. 49.45 (30y) (b) 2. of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 2.... (this act), is amended to read:AB1086,3,9349.45 (30y) (b) 2. Maternal mental health screenings may be provided by a 4licensed midwife, as defined in s. 440.9805 (2), a person licensed to engage in the 5practice of nurse-midwifery under s. 441.15 an individual who is licensed as an 6advanced practice registered nurse and possesses a certified nurse-midwife 7specialty designation under s. 441.09, or any other licensed health care provider 8who may provide the maternal mental health screening consistent with the 9provider’s scope of practice.AB1086,310Section 3. 49.46 (2) (b) 12e. of the statutes is created to read:AB1086,3,121149.46 (2) (b) 12e. Subject to the requirements under s. 49.45 (30y), maternal 12mental health screenings.AB1086,413Section 4. 609.803 of the statutes is created to read:AB1086,3,1614609.803 Maternal mental health screenings. Limited service health 15organizations, preferred provider plans, and defined network plans are subject to s. 16632.895 (15r).AB1086,517Section 5. 632.895 (15r) of the statutes is created to read:AB1086,3,2118632.895 (15r) Maternal mental health screening. Every disability 19insurance policy and self-insured health plan of the state or a county, city, village, 20town, or school district that provides maternity coverage shall cover a maternal 21mental health screening for each pregnancy as described in s. 49.46 (2) (b) 12e.AB1086,622Section 6. Initial applicability.AB1086,4,223(1) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with s. 632.895 1(15r), the treatment of s. 632.895 (15r) first applies to policy or plan years beginning 2on the effective date of this subsection, except as provided in sub. (2).AB1086,4,73(2) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining 4agreement containing provisions inconsistent with s. 632.895 (15r), the treatment 5of s. 632.895 (15r) first applies to policy or plan years beginning on the effective date 6of this subsection or on the day on which the collective bargaining agreement is 7newly established, extended, modified, or renewed, whichever is later.AB1086,78Section 7. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 9publication, except as follows:AB1086,4,1010(1) The amendment of s. 49.45 (30y) (b) 2. takes effect on September 1, 2026.AB1086,4,1111